Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-730
Dissolution; procedure.

Any corporation may dissolve by a majority vote of the members in person at any regular meeting, or at any special meeting of its members called for that purpose. A certificate of dissolution shall be signed by the president or vice president, and attested by the secretary, certifying to such dissolution, and stating that they have been authorized to execute and file such certificate by votes cast in person by a majority of the members of the corporation. A certificate of dissolution shall be executed, acknowledged, filed and recorded in the same manner as the original articles of incorporation of a corporation organized under sections 70-701 to 70-738, and as soon as the Secretary of State shall have accepted the certificate of dissolution for filing and recording, and issued a certificate of dissolution, the corporation shall be deemed to be dissolved.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 28, p. 211;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-828;

R.S.1943, § 70-730.